Hawaii statutes.
§189-5 Aliens not admitted to United
States. It is unlawful for any person who has not been lawfully admitted
to the United States to engage in taking marine life for commercial purposes in
the waters of the State. The term "United States" as used in this
section, includes the several states and the territories and possessions of the
United States. [L 1929, c 187, §7; RL 1935, §336; RL 1945, §1260; am L 1947, c
39, §6; am L 1955, c 96, §6; RL 1955, §21-115; HRS §189-5; am L 1981, c 85,
§82]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next